Illinois, session 104th, SB2870.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Administrative Procedure Act is 5amended by changing Sections 10-25 and 10-50 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 100/10-25)  (from Ch. 127, par. 1010-25)7    Sec. 10-25. Contested cases; notice; hearing. 8    (a) In a contested case, all parties shall be afforded an 9opportunity for a hearing after reasonable notice. The notice 10shall be served personally, by certified or registered mail, 11by email as provided by Section 10-75, or as otherwise 12provided by law upon the parties, their attorneys, or their 13other agents appointed to receive service of process as 14reflected in the administrative record and shall include the 15following:16        (1) A statement of the time, place, and nature of the 17    hearing.18        (2) A statement of the legal authority and 19    jurisdiction under which the hearing is to be held.20        (3) A reference to the particular Sections of the 21    substantive and procedural statutes and rules involved.22        (4) Except where a more detailed statement is 23    otherwise provided for by law, a short and plain statement   SB2870 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 16699 JRC 30103 b1    of the matters asserted, the consequences of a failure to 2    respond, and the official file or other reference number.3        (5) To the extent such information is available, the 4    names, phone numbers, email addresses, and mailing 5    addresses of the administrative law judge or designated 6    agency contact, the parties, and all other persons to whom 7    the agency gives notice of the hearing unless otherwise 8    confidential by law.9        (6) An enclosure written in, at a minimum, English, 10    Arabic, Cantonese, Gujarati, Korean, Mandarin, Polish, 11    Russian, Spanish, Tagalog, Urdu, Ukrainian, and 12    Vietnamese, which notifies the recipient of the ability 13    for a party or the recipient's agent to request 14    interpretive assistance to participate in or understand 15    the hearing and to receive language access services for 16    translating the contents of the notice. A request to 17    receive a written or sight translation of the notice must 18    be made within 7 days of service of the notice.19    (b) An opportunity shall be afforded all parties to be 20represented by legal counsel and to respond and present 21evidence and argument.22    (c) Unless precluded by law, disposition may be made of 23any contested case by stipulation, agreed settlement, consent 24order, or default.25    (d) Language access services and interpretive assistance 26provided in contested hearings shall be, at a minimum, in   SB2870 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 16699 JRC 30103 b1accordance with this Act, and as otherwise provided for in any 2law or rule governing an agency's contested hearings. 3(Source: P.A. 103-1056, eff. 7-1-25.) 4    (5 ILCS 100/10-50)  (from Ch. 127, par. 1010-50)5    Sec. 10-50. Decisions and orders. 6    (a) A final decision or order adverse to a party (other 7than the agency) in a contested case shall be in writing or 8stated in the record. A final decision shall include findings 9of fact and conclusions of law, separately stated. Findings of 10fact, if set forth in statutory language, shall be accompanied 11by a concise and explicit statement of the underlying facts 12supporting the findings. If, in accordance with agency rules, 13a party submitted proposed findings of fact, the decision 14shall include a ruling upon each proposed finding. Parties, 15their attorneys, or their other agents appointed to receive 16service of process as reflected in the administrative record 17shall be notified and provided a copy of the decision or order 18either personally, by registered or certified mail, by email 19as provided by Section 10-75, or as otherwise provided by law. 20In addition, Upon request a copy of the decision or order shall 21be delivered or mailed by first-class regular United States 22mail forthwith to each party and to the party's his attorney of 23record. This mailing requirement does not apply to a party's 24attorney or a party's other agent, or a self-represented 25litigant who has elected to use an agency's electronic filing   SB2870 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 16699 JRC 30103 b1system or has accepted service by email, when the decision or 2order is made available for electronic retrieval through an 3electronic filing system or has been served by email as 4otherwise provided by law. 5    (b) All agency orders shall specify whether they are final 6and subject to the Administrative Review Law. Every final 7order shall contain a list of all parties of record to the case 8including the name and address of the agency or officer 9entering the order and the addresses of each party as known to 10the agency where the parties may be served with pleadings, 11notices, or service of process for any review or further 12proceedings. Every final order shall also state whether the 13rules of the agency require any motion or request for 14reconsideration and cite the rule for the requirement. The 15changes made by this amendatory Act of the 100th General 16Assembly apply to all actions filed under the Administrative 17Review Law on or after the effective date of this amendatory 18Act of the 100th General Assembly.19    (c) A decision by any agency in a contested case under this 20Act shall be void unless the proceedings are conducted in 21compliance with the provisions of this Act relating to 22contested cases, except to the extent those provisions are 23waived under Section 10-70 and except to the extent the agency 24has adopted its own rules for contested cases as authorized in 25Section 1-5.26(Source: P.A. 100-212, eff. 8-18-17; 100-880, eff. 1-1-19;   SB2870 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 16699 JRC 30103 b1101-81, eff. 7-12-19.) 2    Section 10. The Code of Civil Procedure is amended by 3changing Section 3-103 as follows: 4    (735 ILCS 5/3-103)  (from Ch. 110, par. 3-103)5    Sec. 3-103. Commencement of action. Every action to review 6a final administrative decision shall be commenced by the 7filing of a complaint and the issuance of summons within 35 8days after from the date that a copy of the decision sought to 9be reviewed was served upon the party affected by the 10decision, except that in municipalities with a population of 11500,000 or less a complaint filed within the time limit 12established by this Section may be subsequently amended to add 13a police chief or a fire chief in cases brought under the 14Illinois Municipal Code's provisions providing for the 15discipline of fire fighters and police officers. 16    The method of service of the decision shall be as provided 17in the Act governing the procedure before the administrative 18agency, but if no method is provided, a decision shall be 19deemed to have been served upon the party either when a copy of 20the decision is served as provided by Section 10-50 of the 21Illinois Administrative Procedure Act personally delivered or 22when a copy of the decision is deposited in the United States 23mail, in a sealed envelope or package, with postage prepaid, 24addressed to the party affected by the decision at his or her   SB2870 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 16699 JRC 30103 b1last known residence or place of business. The decision must 2also be sent to the party's attorney as provided in Section 310-50 of the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act. 4    The form of the summons and the issuance of alias summons 5shall be according to rules of the Supreme Court.6    This amendatory Act of 1993 applies to all cases involving 7discipline of fire fighters and police officers pending on its 8effective date and to all cases filed on or after its effective 9date.10    The changes to this Section made by this amendatory Act of 11the 95th General Assembly apply to all actions filed on or 12after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 95th 13General Assembly. 14(Source: P.A. 95-831, eff. 8-14-08.) 15    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 16becoming law.